epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/cy.xml
	<patterns>
		.ac4t
		.ad3ae
		.add5as
		.add3o
		.ad4eg
		.ad4eny
		.ad4fer
		.adl4
		.ad3r
		.ae3a
		.af3a
		.af4an
		.aff3
		.afl4u
		.af5lw
		.ag3w
		.am4le
		.am3s
		.an5ad
		.an4g3
		.anghen5a
		.anghen4r
		.an2o
		.anrhyd4
		.ansodd4e
		.an5te
		.an3w4
		.an5we
		.ar4bo
		.ar4cha
		.ar5ddel
		.ared4
		.ar4en
		.arff4
		.ar4ge
		.ar2i
		.ar3we
		.ar4wed
		.as3g
		.as3t
		.aw4e
		.ban4as
		.ban4ed
		.bara5t
		.bel3y
		.be3t4a
		.bl2
		.bl4e
		.br2
		.br4e
		.call5
		.ce4n
		.ch2
		.ch4e
		.ch4l
		.ch4o
		.chollad4
		.chr2
		.chwyn5
		.cl2
		.cr2
		.cy5we
		.dad3r
		.dd2
		.ddefn5
		.dd4i
		.ddi5an
		.ddi5dd
		.ddi3e
		.ddill5adas
		.ddill5ade
		.ddill5ado
		.ddill5adw
		.ddin4
		.ddiw5eddas
		.ddiw5edde
		.ddiw5eddo
		.ddiw5eddw
		.ddwl3
		.ddy5fala
		.ddy5fale
		.ddy5falo
		.ddy5falw
		.ddylad4
		.deallad4
		.defn3
		.der4w
		.deth5
		.di5an
		.di5dd
		.di3e
		.di3gy
		.dill5adas
		.dill5ade
		.dill5ado
		.dill5adw
		.din4
		.diw5eddas
		.diw5edde
		.diw5eddo
		.diw5eddw
		.dr4e
		.dwl3
		.dy5fala
		.dy5fale
		.dy5falo
		.dy5falw
		.dy5fo
		.dylad4
		.dyrchafad4
		.eb2
		.eb3r
		.eb4rw
		.ec2
		.ed2
		.edl4
		.edr4
		.eg2
		.egn3
		.el4or
		.els4
		.en3as
		.eny5na
		.er2
		.erfy5na
		.ern4
		.ewy5na
		.fadd3
		.falch5
		.fan3a
		.farn4ais.
		.fasg4
		.fas5ge
		.ff2
		.ff4a
		.ffer4a
		.ffe5ras
		.ffer4e
		.ff4o
		.ffor5t
		.ff4y
		.ffydd5
		.ffynad4
		.ffy5nas
		.fign5
		.fis5g
		.fon4edi
		.fordd4
		.for4o
		.for4w
		.for4y
		.fr4i
		.fryn4d
		.fydd5
		.fyn5as
		.fyw3
		.gal3e
		.gal5o
		.gan3l
		.gan5olas
		.gan5ole
		.gen5as
		.ger5b
		.geu5d
		.ghwy5na
		.gl2
		.glaf5y
		.gl4e
		.gleid4
		.gl4y
		.glyn3
		.glywad4
		.god3y
		.gof3a
		.goffad4wy
		.gollad4
		.gr2
		.grynho4em
		.grynho4wn
		.gwedd4er
		.gyd3
		.gyf5al
		.gyf5arc
		.gyfer5byna
		.gyfer5byni
		.gyfer5bynn
		.gyffel5
		.gym3o
		.gyn3a
		.gyn5e
		.gynef5
		.gyth5ru
		.gy5we
		.hac4
		.hadl4
		.haf4a
		.haf3l4
		.hagr3
		.ham4le
		.han5as
		.han4g5
		.hanghen5a
		.han5t
		.han5w4
		.har5ddel
		.hared4
		.har4en
		.har3n
		.harn4a
		.har3w
		.has3g
		.haw4
		.heb2
		.hec2
		.hed2
		.hedl4
		.he4o
		.herfy5na
		.her4w
		.heur5
		.hof4r3
		.hol4y
		.holyn5
		.hw2
		.hwn4
		.hwyl5u
		.hwyn5a
		.hwyr5
		.hwyth4au
		.hyd4
		.hydr4
		.hy3ff
		.hyf4od
		.hy5fry
		.hy3g
		.hyl4
		.hym3e
		.hym4u
		.hym4y
		.hymy5na
		.hymysg4
		.hyn2
		.hy3no
		.hy3rw
		.iach4
		.iac5has
		.iac5he
		.iac5hw
		.ir3
		.ladr3
		.ledr4e
		.le3na
		.le3o
		.lest4
		.lin3
		.ll2
		.llaw4e
		.lle5na
		.llo5nas
		.llon4e
		.llythr5
		.lo3na
		.lon4e
		.ludd3
		.lygr3
		.lyn3a
		.lythr5
		.man4ed
		.mant4a
		.mar4f
		.mign5
		.mis5g
		.mol3
		.mon4edi
		.mwyth5a
		.mwyth5w
		.myn5as
		.neilltu4ad
		.neis4i
		.nen3a
		.ner4w
		.ng2
		.ngen5as
		.nghyt5u
		.nghy5wa
		.ngl4
		.ng4w
		.ngy4
		.ni5an
		.ni3e
		.ni5fei
		.nig2
		.ni5ga
		.ni3ge
		.ni3gw
		.ni3gy
		.ni5re
		.ni3wa
		.niwl5
		.no4e
		.no4w
		.nwl3
		.nwyn3
		.oddefad4
		.od4l
		.of3a
		.of4o
		.of4u
		.og2
		.og4l4
		.ol2
		.oll3
		.ol5yga
		.ol5yge
		.olyn3
		.or1
		.orddad4
		.pl4a
		.pl4e
		.rad3r
		.rag3l
		.ra3na
		.ran5d4
		.rew3
		.rhi5a
		.ria4
		.rin4t
		.rug4l5
		.ry3n4a
		.ryn4e
		.sas4
		.ses4
		.st2
		.sych3
		.sych5e
		.talad4
		.tan4e
		.th2
		.thag5
		.th4i
		.tho5e
		.th4r4
		.thrad4
		.th4u
		.torad4
		.tr2
		.tr4a
		.trad4
		.tr4o
		.tro4en
		.uch2
		.wa5r4as
		.war4es
		.wedd4er
		.weithiad4
		.welad4
		.wen3a
		.west4
		.wn4io
		.wobr3
		.wybr4
		.wy3by
		.wy4r
		.wyw3
		.ydd4
		.yd4l
		.yf4ar
		.ym4adw
		.ym3e
		.ym4yl
		.ymysg4
		.yn4d
		.ys4b
		.ysg4
		.ys4i
		.ys4n
		.ys4t
		a1a
		a3ar2
		2ab
		ab3a
		ab4ad
		ab3ed
		ab3el
		ab5ine
		abl1
		a2b1o
		ab4or
		abr3
		a1bu
		a4bu.
		a4bum
		2ac
		ac1a
		ac5ade
		acan3
		ac4aol
		ac3ei
		ace3ne
		ac5enni.
		ach1
		a4ch.
		ach5ac
		ach5aw
		a5chef
		ach3o
		ach3r
		ach5us
		a3chwa
		achwyn5
		achy4
		aci5mw
		acl3
		ac3o
		ac3ta
		ac3te
		4ad3ac
		ad3ad
		ad5afa
		ad3arf
		adar4g
		a4dd.
		add3ad
		ad3dal
		ad3dd
		add3eu
		add5ew
		add3f
		add3i
		add2o
		ad4du
		addun4
		add3yc
		add3ys
		2ad1e
		ad3eg
		ad3el
		ad4el.
		ad4ena
		ad4ene
		ad4eni
		ad4eno
		ad4enw
		ad3i
		2adl
		ad3len
		ad5lys
		ad2na
		adnabydd4e
		adnabydded4
		ad2no
		2ado
		ad3oc
		ad3od
		ad3of
		ad3on
		4adr.
		ad4red
		ad3ri
		adr4od
		adr3on
		ad4ru
		4adunia
		ad5uniad
		ad5uro
		adwel4ed.
		ad3wi
		ad5wr.
		3ad3wys
		ad5wyt
		ad1y
		ady4n
		ad4yrn
		2aea
		ae4ada
		ae5an.
		aedd3
		ae3i
		ael1
		ael4edda
		aen3
		ae3oc
		ae3og
		aer1
		aerw4
		aer5we
		aer5wy
		aes3
		aest4
		aeth5a
		aethr4
		ae1w
		ae5wyd
		af3adw
		4af5aid
		af4al
		af3an
		afan5e
		af4ann
		4afar3
		af5arn
		af4at
		4af3au
		2af3e
		2aff
		aff3a
		aff3ed
		aff3ei
		aff3i
		affl3
		aff3w
		aff3y
		aff4yr
		af3i
		afl3a
		afl5edi
		af4l3u
		2afn1
		af3odd
		4afol
		af3ont
		2afr
		af3ra
		af3res
		af5rif
		af4ru
		af5rwy
		af1u
		2af1w
		af1y
		2a2g
		ag1a
		ag3ad
		ag3al
		age3na
		age5ne
		ag3law
		agl3o
		ag3lu
		agl3w
		ag3n
		ag3od
		ag3of
		ag4ori
		ag1r
		ag3ri
		ag3ry
		ag1u
		ag2w
		ag3wa
		ag3wel
		ag3wn
		ag3wr
		ag5yma
		agy4w
		a1h2
		ahan3
		ahanad4
		ahedr4
		a2i
		2aig
		2ail1
		ailen3
		2ain
		4ainc
		2ait
		2al
		al5abr
		al3ad
		4al3ae
		alaf3
		4alaid
		al3an
		al5arc
		al5aso
		al3ce
		alch3w
		al5cwl
		al4di
		al1e
		al5edau
		al3ei
		al3en
		al4ena
		al4es.
		al2fo
		al3fy
		al3i
		al4is
		all3a
		all3e
		all3i
		all3oc
		all3w
		all3y
		3aln
		al3oc
		al3od
		al4ogia
		alo3na
		alo3n4e
		al3ono
		al3or
		alp4e
		al1u
		4alwc
		alw3e
		4alwr
		al5wst
		al3wy
		4alwy.
		al1y
		2am
		ambl3
		am3d
		amdan5
		amel5o
		am3er
		amgym5r
		amhen4
		amhobl4
		amhryd4
		am5las
		am4led
		am4lf
		am4lg
		am5nif
		am4of
		am2or
		amor5w
		am4pa
		a4mwa
		am5wed
		am5wri
		am5wyd
		am3wyt
		amyn3
		a2n
		2an.
		an1a
		a4nab
		anadl3
		a4nae
		a4naf
		an4afi
		a4nai
		an2as
		an3at4
		a4nau
		a4naw
		4anco
		an2da
		an5dda
		an4ddy
		an2de
		an2do
		an1e
		an2ed
		an3ed.
		an5eda
		an5edd.
		an5edo
		a4n3eg
		a4nel
		an3eli
		an5er.
		an5ewi
		2anf
		an3fy
		2ang1
		ang3ad
		an4gd
		ang3e
		an4gf
		anghaff4
		anghelf4
		anghredad4
		anghrist4
		anghy4
		anghyd4
		anghydna4
		anghyf4
		anghyfar4
		anghyff4
		anghyfiawn4
		anghym4
		anghyn4e
		angl4
		ang5or
		an3if
		an3igi
		4annau
		an3oc
		an3od.
		an3odd
		an5og.
		an5og4ae
		4anol
		an3ol.
		an3om
		an3ont
		an3or
		1anr
		an5sic
		ans4ie
		ans4iw
		an5siwn
		an4ta
		ant5ac
		an5the
		ant3rw
		an1w
		an3wes
		4anwl
		anwy4
		an3wyd
		anwyn3
		an1y
		any4l3
		a1oe
		ap3a
		ap4cy
		ap5elw
		ap3l
		apl4a
		ap5ost
		ap5rwn
		ap5ryn
		ap5wll
		2ar
		ar3ab
		aradr3
		arae3
		ar3af.
		ara5ff
		ar3an
		ar4an.
		aran3a
		aran3e
		arat4
		ar3aw
		ar4ber
		arc3as
		arch5en
		ar5clo
		ar2da
		ar2de
		ard5es
		ar4dr
		ardyn3
		ar1e
		ar2eb
		ar2ei
		ar5eid
		ar3eit
		ar3fa
		arfan5
		arf5ed
		ar5fel
		ar4ff
		ar3fod
		ar1i
		ar4ian
		ar2m
		4arn.
		arn5adwy.
		ar4nd
		3arnh
		ar4no
		ar4nw
		ar4ny
		ar1o
		ar4od.
		ar4odi
		arogl3
		3aror
		ar3os
		5aros.
		ar4p3as
		arp3w
		ar3sy
		ar3te
		ar4th3
		ar3ug
		ar3ut
		aru5wc
		3arwai
		ar5wch
		arwd2
		arw5der
		ar3wed
		3ar3wi
		arw3n
		ar3wn.
		ar3wni
		ar3wy
		4arwyn
		ar3y
		2as.
		2asas
		as5awr
		1asb
		as5boe
		2asd
		2ased
		as4enn
		2asf
		2asg
		as5gal
		asgl3
		asg4oda
		as3gwr
		asg3wy
		2asia
		4asie
		2asl
		2asn
		as4ny
		as4od.
		2asoe
		2asr
		2ast
		as4tal
		as3tan
		astat5
		as3te
		as4tl
		as4tr
		as5trus
		ast2w
		as5ty.
		as3tyl
		astyn3
		2asu
		as3ur
		as5wir
		2aswr
		2asy
		as5ynn
		2a2t
		at3ad
		at5alf
		ateb3
		at3em
		ath3a
		athl3
		ath3o
		ath4r3e
		athr3w
		athr5yc
		ath3w
		ath3y
		ato2i
		at3ol
		a3tô
		at3ran
		atr5oc
		at3rod
		atro5e
		atr5yc
		at3wy
		aty3na
		aty5ne
		a2u
		2aul
		2aw
		aw1a
		aw5art
		aw5chw
		aw5ddr
		aw5dry
		aw3ed
		aw3ei
		aw3el
		aw3es
		aw3f
		aw3ga
		aw1i
		awl5ed
		awn3a
		awr1
		awr3d
		awy4r3
		3áu.
		1â
		bab4i
		bab5yd
		b3ac
		bach3
		badd3
		b3adw
		1bae
		2baet
		b1af
		b1ai
		b1an
		ban3a
		ban3e
		b4ann
		ban3o
		5barch
		bar4f
		bar4lys.
		barn3
		bar4wy
		b1as
		bas3g2
		bast4
		bat4a
		b4ath
		b1au
		bawd4a
		bawe5na
		b1d
		b1ec
		2bed
		beir4a
		be4iw
		b1em
		ben4ae
		be3nas
		be5ned
		bengl4
		bens4
		bent4
		b3ent.
		ben3w
		benwy5na
		b3ert
		b3esi
		bgal4
		2b1i
		b3ia
		bi5aidd
		3bib1
		b3id3
		b3ie
		3b2ig1
		b4inc
		bin2e
		b3io
		b3ir
		bisg4
		b3it
		bl3af
		bl5air
		bla3na
		bla5nedi
		bla5nes
		2blau
		bl5awd
		bl3ec
		bl4enni.
		blew3
		4blwr
		b4lyc
		4blyn
		bl5yn.
		bo4b4l
		b1oc
		4b3odd
		bol3
		b1om
		b2on
		bon4d
		b2r
		bra3na
		br3ed
		breg3y
		br3em
		br4enn
		br2i
		br4il
		br3ir
		brod4iae
		brog4
		br4wd
		bryf3
		bryn4d
		b1s2
		bse3na
		bse5ne
		2bu.
		1bua
		budd4l
		bu4lo
		3buo
		bw3a
		b1wc
		3bwll
		b1wn
		b4wns
		bwr1
		4bwyd
		b3wyd.
		4b3wyf
		bwyllt4
		3bwyn
		bwy4r3
		2by
		b3ych.
		bydd5i
		b2yl
		3bylla
		by3na
		by3ned
		by3nes
		byrf4
		b4yrw
		3byst.
		byw3
		cabl4en
		c1ad
		cad3a
		cad3l
		cae4a
		caethiw4ed
		c1af
		c3ai
		cal3e
		cal3o
		cam4enn
		camn4
		can3a
		ca4ne
		canghe5na
		can3l
		c4ann
		can5olas
		can5ole
		c3ant
		can4yd
		car4en
		car4ped.
		c1as
		casg4e
		3cat
		ca4t3r
		c3au
		c3áu
		c1b
		cd2
		c1e
		c3ed
		c5edig
		ceg3
		c3el
		c2en
		ce3na
		c3ent
		cer5by
		cer4f
		cer3y
		ceu4l
		c3ff
		3chae
		ch3af.
		ch4afb
		ch4afi
		chan3a
		changhe5na
		char4enn
		chasg4e
		chdr5y
		ch3eba
		ch3ebe
		ch3ebi
		ch3ebo
		ch3ebw
		ch3ech
		ch3ed.
		ch3edi
		5chein
		chelad4
		ch3ent
		chen3y
		ch3er.
		cher4f
		ch3esg
		3chest
		4chestio
		4chestol
		4chestwa
		4chestwe
		ch3eta
		ch5ig.
		chleid4
		chl5ent
		4chmyni
		4chmynnol
		chn5eg
		chob3
		chobl4
		ch3odd
		chon5ad4
		ch3ont
		chon4y
		chra4
		ch4ro
		4chu.
		ch4ub
		4chus
		5chwant
		ch3wch
		chw4f
		ch4wi
		ch3wn.
		ch3wyf
		chyd3
		chym4an
		ch4ynn
		chysg3
		chys5o
		chyt3u
		chy5wa
		c1i
		cib3
		cig1
		c3in
		ci3od.
		cl2e
		cleid4
		cl2i
		c1ll
		cllon3
		cloe4
		cl2w
		cl4wm
		cly4w
		clywad4
		cn2
		cno4en
		cn4yw
		cob1
		co4bl4
		c1oc
		c1od
		cod4l
		coffad4wy
		collad4
		c1om
		c1on
		con4y
		corn4an
		cosb3
		cr3ae
		cra4m
		3crat
		credad4
		cr4el
		cr3ie
		cring4
		crof4
		crog3
		cron4a
		cro5nas
		cron4e
		cryg3
		crygl4
		cr4yl
		cr4ym
		crynho4em
		crynho4i
		cs3a
		c3s4aw
		cs3yn
		ct2a
		c4teg
		ct4id
		c1to
		ctor3
		c3tr
		1cu
		2cus
		c1w
		c3wa
		cwast3
		cw4fa
		cwm3
		cwn4ed
		c3wy
		c4wyn3
		cwy4r
		cyb3y
		2c1yc
		cych3
		cyd3
		cydl4
		cydr4
		cy4f3a
		cyfer3
		cyffel5
		c1yl
		cyll5a
		cym3
		cym4an
		cym4ero
		c1yn
		cyn3a
		c5ynau
		cyn3e
		cynef3
		c2yny
		cy4se
		cysg3
		cys5on
		cys3t
		cys3w
		cyth5rud
		cy1w
		cy3wa
		cy3wi
		cy3wy
		d1a2
		dach3
		d3ach.
		d5achwr
		d2ad
		dad3u
		dad3w
		d5adwy
		dae5ara
		dae5ared
		dae5ari
		dae5arw
		d2ael
		d4afe
		d4afo
		dag1
		dag3w
		4dail
		da5ion
		d4ait
		d4al.
		d4ald
		d4aln
		d4alr
		d2an3a
		d2an3e
		dan3f
		d2ano
		d2anu
		d2anw
		d2any
		dar3a
		dar4ana
		dar4d
		darf2
		d5arne
		dar3w
		d5aryd
		2das
		2dau
		2daw
		dawd3
		d5awd.
		d1b
		ddad3r
		4ddaf
		3ddang
		dd4ani
		dd3ara
		dd3ari
		dd3arw
		2ddas
		dd4aw
		ddd2
		d4dda
		ddd4e
		dd4d4i4
		dd3dr
		dd4du
		dd4dy
		dd5dy.
		dd3er.
		ddeth5
		ddeuad4
		dd4eug
		dd4ew
		dd2f
		dd4fg
		2ddi.
		dd4ic
		dd4if
		ddif3a
		dd4ig.
		ddi3gy
		dd4il
		dd4im
		dd4ini
		4ddit
		dd1l2
		dd5len
		2ddo.
		4ddoc
		dd3odd
		4ddom
		4ddon3
		dd2or3
		ddr2
		ddr4a
		ddr4e
		ddr4i
		ddr4o
		ddr4w
		dd4ry
		d2du
		4dd3un
		dd5us.
		dd5waw
		4ddwc
		dd2we
		4ddwn
		5ddwrn
		dd4wyn
		3ddwyr
		dd2y
		4ddyc
		dd4ydd
		dd5yf.
		ddym4d
		dd4yn
		ddy5nad
		5ddyni
		4ddynt
		3ddyr
		3deb.
		debr3
		d1ec
		dech4a
		d1ed
		d5edd.
		deddf3
		def3a
		d1eg
		d5egol.
		de1h
		deheu5
		d2eil
		d4eim
		delff5
		d3ella
		d3elle
		d3elli
		d3ello
		dellt5
		d3ellw
		del3o
		d1em
		d3em.
		2d1en1
		d4eng
		d3ent
		de2o
		der3f
		derfyn5
		2d1es
		d3esi
		5destu
		d1et
		det5an
		deth4o
		d1eu1
		deul4
		deu4ny
		d4eut
		d1f2
		d3f4ae
		df4ann
		df4ao
		d4fa5ol
		df4at
		df4aw
		dfed5r
		d3fei
		dfe5ne
		d5ferf
		d4fery
		dff4y
		d2fi
		df4id
		df4od
		d4f3ol
